dev/apertium-far.far.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
 
  <!-- Define the alphabet below. -->
  <alphabet>اآبپتثجچحخرزژدذسشصضطظعغفقکگلمنوهی</alphabet>

 <sdefs>
    <!-- Define symbol definitions within <sdef> here. -->
    <sdef n="n"               c="Noun"/>
     <sdef n="np"              c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="v"               c="Verb"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"           c="Verb, lexical"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"           c="Modal verb"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"            c="Auxiliary verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"           c="'To be' verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"         c="'To have' verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbdo"            c="The verb 'to do'"/> 
    <sdef n="lnk"             c="Linking"/> 
	<sdef n="sub"             c="Subordinаting"/>
    <sdef n="cnj"             c="Conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="coo"             c="Co-ordinаting"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"          c="Subordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"          c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"          c="Adverbial conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="pr"              c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="post"            c="Postposition"/>
	<sdef n="prev"            c="Preverbal particle"/>
	<sdef n="adv"             c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="ij"              c="Interjection"/>
    <sdef n="adj"             c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="prn"             c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="an"              c="Animate / inanimate"/> 

	<sdef n="enc"              c="Enclitic"/>
	<sdef n="encacc"           c="Enclitic Accusative"/>
	<sdef n="encrel"           c="Enclitic Relative"/>
    
	<sdef n="attr"            c="Attributive"/>
	<sdef n="top"             c="Toponym"/>
    <sdef n="ant"             c="Anthroponym"/>
    <sdef n="cog"             c="Cognomen"/>
    <sdef n="org"             c="Organisation"/>
    <sdef n="al"              c="Altres / misc proper nouns"/>

	
	<sdef n="nr"              c="Near"/>
	<sdef n="fr"              c="Far"/>
	
    <sdef n="pers"            c="Personal pronoun"/>
   <sdef n="ref"             c="Reflexive pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="res"             c="Reciprocal pronoun"/>

    <sdef n="det"             c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="pos"             c="Possessive"/>
    <sdef n="rel"             c="Relаtive"/>
    <sdef n="rpl"             c="Relаtive Plural"/>
    <sdef n="rsg"             c="Relаtive Singular"/>
    <sdef n="psg"             c="Possesive Singular"/>
    <sdef n="ppl"             c="Possesive plural"/>
    <sdef n="psp"             c="Possesive Singular / plural"/>
    <sdef n="objsg"           c="Object Singular"/>
    <sdef n="objpl"           c="Object Plural"/>
	<sdef n="art"             c="Article"/>
	
    <sdef n="p1possg"             c=""/>
    <sdef n="p2possg"             c=""/>
    <sdef n="p3possg"             c=""/>
	<sdef n="p1pospl"             c=""/>
	<sdef n="p2pospl"             c=""/>
	<sdef n="p3pospl"             c=""/>

    <sdef n="p1"              c="1st person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"              c="2nd person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"              c="3rd person"/>

	<sdef n="relplenc"        c="Relative Plural Enclitic"/>
	<sdef n="relsgenc"        c="Relative Singular Enclitic"/>
	
    <sdef n="nt"              c="Neuter"/>
    <sdef n="ut"              c="Utrum"/>
    <sdef n="f"               c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="m"               c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="un"              c="No gender"/>
    <sdef n="mf"              c="Masculine / feminine"/> 
    <sdef n="GD"              c="Gender to be determined"/>
	
    <sdef n="sg"              c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="du"              c="Dual"/>
    <sdef n="pl"              c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="sp"              c="Singular / plural"/>

    <sdef n="ind"             c="Indefinite"/>
    <sdef n="def"             c="Definite"/>

    <sdef n="nom"             c="Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="acc"             c="Accusative"/>
    <sdef n="gen"             c="Genitive"/>

    <sdef n="dem"             c="Demonstrative"/>
	<sdef n="itg"             c="Question word / interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="I"               c="Interrogation"/>
	<sdef n="qnt"             c="Quantifier"/>
    <sdef n="neg"             c="Negative"/>
    <sdef n="emph"            c="Emphatic"/>

	<sdef n="inf"             c="Infinitive"/>
    <sdef n="im"              c="Imperfect"/>
	<sdef n="pii"             c="Imperfect Indicative"/>
	<sdef n="pres"            c="Present"/>
    <sdef n="past"            c="Past"/>
	<sdef n="ft"              c="Future"/>
	<sdef n="imp"             c="Imperative"/>
    <sdef n="prt"             c="participle"/>
	<sdef n="pret"            c="Preterite"/>
	<sdef n="pp"              c="Perfect participle"/>
   <sdef n="pstp"            c="Past Perfect"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"            c="Present participle"/>
	<sdef n="prsp"            c="Present perfect"/>
	<sdef n="pstprog"         c="Past Progressive"/>
	<sdef n="pprsrog"         c="Present Progressive"/>
	<sdef n="pstsub"          c="Past Subjunctive"/>
	<sdef n="pasv"            c="Passive"/>
    <sdef n="actv"            c="Active voice"/>
    <sdef n="sep"             c="Separable verb"/>
    
	<sdef n="subj"            c="Subject"/> 
    <sdef n="obj"             c="Object"/>
	
	<sdef n="prs"            c="Present subjunctive"/> 
    <sdef n="pis"            c="Imperative subjunctive"/> 
    <sdef n="fts"            c="Future subjunctive"/> 
	
    <sdef n="sint"            c="Synthetic (of adjectives)"/>
    <sdef n="pst"             c="Positive"/>
    <sdef n="comp"            c="Comparative"/>
    <sdef n="sup"             c="Superlative"/>

    <sdef n="ord"             c="Ordinal"/>
    <sdef n="acr"             c="Acronym"/>
    <sdef n="cnt"             c="Countable"/>
	<sdef n="unc"             c="Uncountable"/>
    <sdef n="loc"             c="Location"/>  
    <sdef n="time"            c="Time"/>
	
	<sdef n="num"             c="Numeral"/>
    <sdef n="sent"            c="Sentence end"/>
    <sdef n="cm"              c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="apos"            c="Apostrophe"/>
    <sdef n="guio"            c="Dash"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"            c="Left parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"            c="Right parenthesis"/>
    <sdef n="lquot"           c="Left quote"/>
    <sdef n="rquot"           c="Right quote"/>
    <sdef n="sym"             c="Symbol"/>
	<sdef n="unk"             c="unknown"/>

    <sdef n="compound-only-L" c="May only be the left-side of a compound"/>
    <sdef n="compound-R"      c="May be the right-side of a compound, or a full word"/>
   
    
  </sdefs>
  
   <pardefs>
    <!-- Define paradigms within </pardef> here.  -->
   
	<pardef n="ragham__n">

      <e i=""><re>[0-9]+</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
	  <e i=""><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
    <pardef n="adad__n">
	  <e><p><l/><r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	
	<pardef n="rabtecoo__n">
		<e><p><l/><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
   
    <pardef n="rabtesub__n">
	<e><p><l/><r><s n="cnjsub"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="rabteadv__n">
		<e><p><l/><r><s n="cnjadv"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>
	
   <pardef n="esmkhas__n">
   		<e><p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="unk"/></r></p></e>
   <e><p><l>ها</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="unk"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ان</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="unk"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ین</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="unk"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ات</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="unk"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>
  
  <pardef n="harftarifnk__n">
  <e><p><l/><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
    
	<pardef n="harftarifmr__n">
  <e><p><l/><r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

 <e> here. -->
    <e lm="و"><i>و</i><par n="rabtecoo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="یا"><i>یا</i><par n="rabtecoo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="همچنان‌که"><i>همچنان‌که</i><par n="rabtecoo__n"/></e>
    <e lm="اگر"><i>اگر</i><par n="rabtesub__n"/></e>
    <e lm="گویی"><i>گویی</i><par n="rabtesub__n"/></e>
	<e lm="یک"><i>یک</i><par n="adad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="دو"><i>دو</i><par n="adad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="سه"><i>سه</i><par n="adad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="چهار"><i>چهار</i><par n="adad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="پنج"><i>پنج</i><par n="adad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="هفده"><i>هفده</i><par n="adad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="هجده"><i>هجده</i><par n="adad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="هیجده"><i>هیجده</i><par n="adad__n"/></e>
	<e lm="شش"><i>شش</i><par n="adad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="هفت"><i>هفت</i><par n="adad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="هشت"><i>هشت</i><par n="adad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="نه"><i>نه</i><par n="adad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ده"><i>ده</i><par n="adad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="یازده"><i>یازده</i><par n="adad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="دوازده"><i>دوازده</i><par n="adad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="سیزده"><i>سیزده</i><par n="adad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="چهارده"><i>چهارده</i><par n="adad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="پانزده"><i>پانزده</i><par n="adad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="شانزده"><i>شانزده</i><par n="adad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="نوزده"><i>نوزده</i><par n="adad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بیست"><i>بیست</i><par n="adad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="سی"><i>سی</i><par n="adad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="چهل"><i>چهل</i><par n="adad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="پنجاه"><i>پنجاه</i><par n="adad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="شصت"><i>شصت</i><par n="adad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="هفتاد"><i>هفتاد</i><par n="adad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="هشتاد"><i>هشتاد</i><par n="adad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="نود"><i>نود</i><par n="adad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="صد"><i>صد</i><par n="adad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="یکصد"><i>یکصد</i><par n="adad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="سیصد"><i>سیصد</i><par n="adad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="پانصد"><i>پانصد</i><par n="adad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="هفتصد"><i>هفتصد</i><par n="adad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="نهصد"><i>نهصد</i><par n="adad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="میلیون"><i>میلیون</i><par n="adad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بیلیون"><i>بیلیون</i><par n="adad__n"/></e>
	<e lm="کرمانشاه"><i>کرمانشاه</i><par n="esmkhas__n"/></e>
	<e lm="کهگیلویه"><i>کهگیلویه</i><par n="esmkhas__n"/></e>
	<e lm="ناصر"><i>ناصر</i><par n="esmkhas__n"/></e>
	<e lm="شریعتی"><i>شریعتی</i><par n="esmkhas__n"/></e>
	<e lm="خراسان"><i>خراسان</i><par n="esmkhas__n"/></e>
	<e lm="اسفندقه"><i>اسفندقه</i><par n="esmkhas__n"/></e>
	<e lm="جیجاق"><i>جیجاق</i><par n="esmkhas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="پیام"><i>پیام</i><par n="esmkhas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ساق‌آباد"><i>ساق‌آباد</i><par n="esmkhas__n"/></e>
	<e lm="استقلال"><i>استقلال</i><par n="esmkhas__n"/></e>
	<e lm="فاسکیل"><i>فاسکیل</i><par n="esmkhas__n"/></e>
	<e lm="اردبیل"><i>اردبیل</i><par n="esmkhas__n"/></e>
	<e lm="مرزآباد"><i>مرزآباد</i><par n="esmkhas__n"/></e>
	<e lm="کاووس"><i>کاووس</i><par n="esmkhas__n"/></e>
	<e lm="سیما"><i>سیما</i><par n="esmkhas__n"/></e>
	<e lm="رشت"><i>رشت</i><par n="esmkhas__n"/></e>
	<e lm="نماز"><i>نماز</i><par n="esmkhas__n"/></e>
	<e lm="ادوارد"><i>ادوارد</i><par n="esmkhas__n"/></e>
	<e lm="لری"><i>لری</i><par n="esmkhas__n"/></e>
	<e lm="سنت هلن"><i>سنت<b/>هلن</i><par n="esmkhas__n"/></e>
	<e lm="فرانک چرچیل"><i>فرانک<b/>چرچیل</i><par n="esmkhas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کارکاروف"><i>کارکاروف</i><par n="esmkhas__n"/></e>
	<e lm="لندن"><i>لندن</i><par n="esmkhas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="مان سون"><i>مان<b/>سون</i><par n="esmkhas__n"/></e>
	<e lm="سارا گوس"><i>سارا<b/>گوس</i><par n="esmkhas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کوپر"><i>کوپر</i><par n="esmkhas__n"/></e>
	<e lm="فی"><i>فی</i><par n="esmkhas__n"/></e>
	<e lm="فانتین"><i>فانتین</i><par n="esmkhas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="جاستین"><i>جاستین</i><par n="esmkhas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="هانی"><i>هانی</i><par n="esmkhas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="استاب"><i>استاب</i><par n="esmkhas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="افسون جمع‌آوری"><i>افسون<b/>جمع‌آوری</i><par n="esmkhas__n"/></e>
	<e lm="هابیتون"><i>هابیتون</i><par n="esmkhas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="یورک شایر"><i>یورک<b/>شایر</i><par n="esmkhas__n"/></e>
	<e lm="دمونت کریس تو"><i>دمونت کریس تو</i><par n="esmkhas__n"/></e>
	<e lm="پو اره"><i>پو اره</i><par n="esmkhas__n"/></e>
	<e lm="را"><i>را</i><par n="harftarifmr__n"/></e>
    <e lm="یک"><i>یک</i><par n="harftarifnk__n"/></e>
